California, session 20252026, AB1848.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 52352 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:52352. (a) Each application for an annual registration shall be accompanied by the payment of a fee in the amount of forty dollars ($40) for each fiscal year or portion of a fiscal year beginning July 1.(b) (1) The secretary, after consulting with the board, may increase the fee described in subdivision (a) to one hundred dollars ($100) for each fiscal year or portion of a fiscal year beginning July 1.(2) On and after January 1, 2028, the secretary, after consulting with the board, may annually increase the fee described in subdivision (a) by up to fifty dollars ($50) for each fiscal year or portion of a fiscal year beginning July 1, but the fee shall not exceed three hundred dollars ($300).